North Dakota, session 69, SB2023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds, to the North Dakota racing
commission for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the North Dakota racing commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Racing commission $630,334 $63,755 $694,089
New and vacant FTE pool 0 4,953 4,953
Total all funds $630,334 $68,708 $699,042
Less other funds 172,257 4,967 177,224
Total general fund $458,077 $63,741 $521,818
Full-time equivalent positions 2.00 0.00 2.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund
Copier replacement $13,000
Internships 20,000
Total $33,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The racing
commission may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1 of
the Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and
vacant FTE pool line item to the racing commission line item in accordance with the guidelines and
reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly.

S. B. NO. 2023 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2023.
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 5 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 65 Nays 25 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State